Utah statutes.
20A-11-101 (Superseded 01/01/11).   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Address" means the number and street where an individual resides or
where a reporting entity has its principal office.
(2)  "Ballot proposition" includes initiatives, referenda, proposed
constitutional amendments, and any other ballot propositions submitted to the
voters that are authorized by the Utah Code Annotated 1953.
(3)  "Candidate" means any person who:
(a)  files a declaration of candidacy for a public office; or
(b)  receives contributions, makes expenditures, or gives consent for any
other person to receive contributions or make expenditures to bring about the
person's nomination or election to a public office.
(4)  "Chief election officer" means:
(a)  the lieutenant governor for state office candidates, legislative office
candidates, officeholders, political parties, political action committees,
corporations, political issues committees, and state school board candidates;
and
(b)  the county clerk for local school board candidates.
(5)  "Continuing political party" means an organization of voters that
participated in the last regular general election and polled a total vote
equal to 2% or more of the total votes cast for all candidates for the United
States House of Representatives.
(6) (a)  "Contribution" means any of the following when done for political
purposes:
(i)  a gift, subscription, donation, loan, advance, or deposit of money or
anything of value given to the filing entity;
(ii)  an express, legally enforceable contract, promise, or agreement to make
a gift, subscription, donation, unpaid or partially unpaid loan, advance, or
deposit of money or anything of value to the filing entity;
(iii)  any transfer of funds from another reporting entity or a corporation to
the filing entity;
(iv)  compensation paid by any person or reporting entity other than the
filing entity for personal services provided without charge to the filing
entity;
(v)  remuneration from any organization or its directly affiliated
organization that has a registered lobbyist to compensate a legislator for a
loss of salary or income while the Legislature is in session;
(vi)  salaries or other remuneration paid to a legislator by any agency or
subdivision of the state, including school districts, for the period the
Legislature is in session; and
(vii)  goods or services provided to or for the benefit of the filing entity
at less than fair market value.
(b)  "Contribution" does not include:
(i)  services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a
portion or all of their time on behalf of the filing entity;
(ii)  money lent to the filing entity by a financial institution in the
ordinary course of business; or
(iii)  goods or services provided for the benefit of a candidate or political
party at less than fair market value that are not authorized by or coordinated
with the candidate or political party.
(7)  "Coordinated with" means that goods or services provided for the benefit
of a candidate or political party are provided:
(a)  with the candidate's or political party's prior knowledge, if the
candidate or political party does not object;
(b)  by agreement with the candidate or political party;
(c)  in coordination with the candidate or political party; or
(d)  using official logos, slogans, and similar elements belonging to a
candidate or political party.
(8) (a)  "Corporation" means a domestic or foreign, profit or nonprofit,
business organization that is registered as a corporation or is authorized to
do business in a state and makes any expenditure from corporate funds for:
(i)  the purpose of expressly advocating for political purposes; or
(ii)  the purpose of expressly advocating the approval or the defeat of any
ballot proposition.
(b)  "Corporation" does not mean:
(i)  a business organization's political action committee or political issues
committee; or
(ii)  a business entity organized as a partnership or a sole proprietorship.
(9)  "Detailed listing" means:
(a)  for each contribution or public service assistance:
(i)  the name and address of the individual or source making the contribution
or public service assistance;
(ii)  the amount or value of the contribution or public service assistance;
and
(iii)  the date the contribution or public service assistance was made; and
(b)  for each expenditure:
(i)  the amount of the expenditure;
(ii)  the person or entity to whom it was disbursed;
(iii)  the specific purpose, item, or service acquired by the expenditure; and
(iv)  the date the expenditure was made.
(10)  "Election" means each:
(a)  regular general election;
(b)  regular primary election; and
(c)  special election at which candidates are eliminated and selected.
(11) (a)  "Expenditure" means:
(i)  any disbursement from contributions, receipts, or from the separate bank
account required by this chapter;
(ii)  a purchase, payment, donation, distribution, loan, advance, deposit,
gift of money, or anything of value made for political purposes;
(iii)  an express, legally enforceable contract, promise, or agreement to make
any purchase, payment, donation, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, gift of
money, or anything of value for political purposes;
(iv)  compensation paid by a corporation or filing entity for personal
services rendered by a person without charge to a reporting entity;
(v)  a transfer of funds between the filing entity and a candidate's personal
campaign committee; or
(vi)  goods or services provided by the filing entity to or for the benefit of
another reporting entity for political purposes at less than fair market
value.
(b)  "Expenditure" does not include:
(i)  services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a
portion or all of their time on behalf of a reporting entity;
(ii)  money lent to a reporting entity by a financial institution in the
ordinary course of business; or
(iii)  anything listed in Subsection (11)(a) that is given by a corporation or
reporting entity to candidates for office or officeholders in states other
than Utah.
(12)  "Filing entity" means the reporting entity that is filing a financial
statement required by this chapter or Chapter 12, Part 2, Judicial Retention
Elections.
(13)  "Financial statement" includes any summary report, interim report,
verified financial statement, or other statement disclosing contributions,
expenditures, receipts, donations, or disbursements that is required by this
chapter.
(14)  "Governing board" means the individual or group of individuals that
determine the candidates and committees that will receive expenditures from a
political action committee.
(15)  "Incorporation" means the process established by Title 10, Chapter 2,
Part 1, Incorporation, by which a geographical area becomes legally recognized
as a city or town.
(16)  "Incorporation election" means the election authorized by Section
10-2-111.
(17)  "Incorporation petition" means a petition authorized by Section
10-2-109.
(18)  "Individual" means a natural person.
(19)  "Interim report" means a report identifying the contributions received
and expenditures made since the last report.
(20)  "Legislative office" means the office of state senator, state
representative, speaker of the House of Representatives, president of the
Senate, and the leader, whip, and assistant whip of any party caucus in either
house of the Legislature.
(21)  "Legislative office candidate" means a person who:
(a)  files a declaration of candidacy for the office of state senator or state
representative;
(b)  declares himself to be a candidate for, or actively campaigns for, the
position of speaker of the House of Representatives, president of the Senate,
or the leader, whip, and assistant whip of any party caucus in either house of
the Legislature; or
(c)  receives contributions, makes expenditures, or gives consent for any
other person to receive contributions or make expenditures to bring about the
person's nomination or election to a legislative office.
(22)  "Newly registered political party" means an organization of voters that
has complied with the petition and organizing procedures of this chapter to
become a registered political party.
(23)  "Officeholder" means a person who holds a public office.
(24)  "Party committee" means any committee organized by or authorized by the
governing board of a registered political party.
(25)  "Person" means both natural and legal persons, including individuals,
business organizations, personal campaign committees, party committees,
political action committees, political issues committees, labor unions, and
labor organizations.
(26)  "Personal campaign committee" means the committee appointed by a
candidate to act for the candidate as provided in this chapter.
(27)  "Personal use expenditure" has the same meaning as provided under
Section 20A-11-104.
(28) (a)  "Political action committee" means an entity, or any group of
individuals or entities within or outside this state, a major purpose of which
is to:
(i)  solicit or receive contributions from any other person, group, or entity
for political purposes; or
(ii)  make expenditures to expressly advocate for any person to refrain from
voting or to vote for or against any candidate for a municipal or county
office.
(b)  "Political action committee" includes groups affiliated with a registered
political party but not authorized or organized by the governing board of the
registered political party that receive contributions or makes expenditures
for political purposes.
(c)  "Political action committee" does not mean:
(i)  a party committee;
(ii)  any entity that provides goods or services to a candidate or committee
in the regular course of its business at the same price that would be provided
to the general public;
(iii)  an individual;
(iv)  individuals who are related and who make contributions from a joint
checking account;
(v)  a corporation, except a corporation a major purpose of which is to act as
a political action committee; or
(vi)  a personal campaign committee.
(29)  "Political convention" means a county or state political convention held
by a registered political party to select candidates.
(30) (a)  "Political issues committee" means an entity, or any group of
individuals or entities within or outside this state, a major purpose of which
is to:
(i)  solicit or receive donations from any other person, group, or entity to
assist in placing a ballot proposition on the ballot, assist in keeping a
ballot proposition off the ballot, or to advocate that a voter refrain from
voting or vote for or vote against any ballot proposition;
(ii)  make expenditures to expressly advocate for any person to sign or refuse
to sign a ballot proposition or incorporation petition or refrain from voting,
vote for, or vote against any proposed ballot proposition or an incorporation
in an incorporation election; or
(iii)  make expenditures to assist in qualifying or placing a ballot
proposition on the ballot or to assist in keeping a ballot proposition off the
ballot.
(b)  "Political issues committee" does not mean:
(i)  a registered political party or a party committee;
(ii)  any entity that provides goods or services to an individual or committee
in the regular course of its business at the same price that would be provided
to the general public;
(iii)  an individual;
(iv)  individuals who are related and who make contributions from a joint
checking account; or
(v)  a corporation, except a corporation a major purpose of which is to act as
a political issues committee.
(31) (a)  "Political issues contribution" means any of the following:
(i)  a gift, subscription, unpaid or partially unpaid loan, advance, or
deposit of money or anything of value given to a political issues committee;
(ii)  an express, legally enforceable contract, promise, or agreement to make
a political issues donation to influence the approval or defeat of any ballot
proposition;
(iii)  any transfer of funds received by a political issues committee from a
reporting entity;
(iv)  compensation paid by another reporting entity for personal services
rendered without charge to a political issues committee; and
(v)  goods or services provided to or for the benefit of a political issues
committee at less than fair market value.
(b)  "Political issues contribution" does not include:
(i)  services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a
portion or all of their time on behalf of a political issues committee; or
(ii)  money lent to a political issues committee by a financial institution in
the ordinary course of business.
(32) (a)  "Political issues expenditure" means any of the following:
(i)  any payment from political issues contributions made for the purpose of
influencing the approval or the defeat of:
(A)  a ballot proposition; or
(B)  an incorporation petition or incorporation election;
(ii)  a purchase, payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of
money made for the express purpose of influencing the approval or the defeat
of:
(A)  a ballot proposition; or
(B)  an incorporation petition or incorporation election;
(iii)  an express, legally enforceable contract, promise, or agreement to make
any political issues expenditure;
(iv)  compensation paid by a reporting entity for personal services rendered
by a person without charge to a political issues committee; or
(v)  goods or services provided to or for the benefit of another reporting
entity at less than fair market value.
(b)  "Political issues expenditure" does not include:
(i)  services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a
portion or all of their time on behalf of a political issues committee; or
(ii)  money lent to a political issues committee by a financial institution in
the ordinary course of business.
(33)  "Political purposes" means an act done with the intent or in a way to
influence or tend to influence, directly or indirectly, any person to refrain
from voting or to vote for or against any candidate for public office or
municipal or county office at any caucus, political convention, primary, or
election.
(34)  "Primary election" means any regular primary election held under the
election laws.
(35)  "Public office" means the office of governor, lieutenant governor, state
auditor, state treasurer, attorney general, state or local school board
member, state senator, state representative, speaker of the House of
Representatives, president of the Senate, and the leader, whip, and assistant
whip of any party caucus in either house of the Legislature.
(36) (a)  "Public service assistance" means the following when given or
provided to an officeholder to defray the costs of functioning in a public
office or aid the officeholder to communicate with the officeholder's
constituents:
(i)  a gift, subscription, donation, unpaid or partially unpaid loan, advance,
or deposit of money or anything of value to an officeholder; or
(ii)  goods or services provided at less than fair market value to or for the
benefit of the officeholder.
(b)  "Public service assistance" does not include:
(i)  anything provided by the state;
(ii)  services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a
portion or all of their time on behalf of an officeholder;
(iii)  money lent to an officeholder by a financial institution in the
ordinary course of business;
(iv)  news coverage or any publication by the news media; or
(v)  any article, story, or other coverage as part of any regular publication
of any organization unless substantially all the publication is devoted to
information about the officeholder.
(37)  "Publicly identified class of individuals" means a group of 50 or more
individuals sharing a common occupation, interest, or association that
contribute to a political action committee or political issues committee and
whose names can be obtained by contacting the political action committee or
political issues committee upon whose financial report they are listed.
(38)  "Receipts" means contributions and public service assistance.
(39)  "Registered lobbyist" means a person registered under Title 36, Chapter
11, Lobbyist Disclosure and Regulation Act.
(40)  "Registered political action committee" means any political action
committee that is required by this chapter to file a statement of organization
with the lieutenant governor's office.
(41)  "Registered political issues committee" means any political issues
committee that is required by this chapter to file a statement of organization
with the lieutenant governor's office.
(42)  "Registered political party" means an organization of voters that:
(a)  participated in the last regular general election and polled a total vote
equal to 2% or more of the total votes cast for all candidates for the United
States House of Representatives for any of its candidates for any office; or
(b)  has complied with the petition and organizing procedures of this chapter.
(43)  "Reporting entity" means a candidate, a candidate's personal campaign
committee, an officeholder, a party committee, a political action committee, a
political issues committee, or a corporation.
(44)  "School board office" means the office of state school board or local
school board.
(45) (a)  "Source" means the person or entity that is the legal owner of the
tangible or intangible asset that comprises the contribution.
(b)  "Source" means, for political action committees and corporations, the
political action committee and the corporation as entities, not the
contributors to the political action committee or the owners or shareholders
of the corporation.
(46)  "State office" means the offices of governor, lieutenant governor,
attorney general, state auditor, and state treasurer.
(47)  "State office candidate" means a person who:
(a)  files a declaration of candidacy for a state office; or
(b)  receives contributions, makes expenditures, or gives consent for any
other person to receive contributions or make expenditures to bring about the
person's nomination or election to a state office.
(48)  "Summary report" means the year end report containing the summary of a
reporting entity's contributions and expenditures.
(49)  "Supervisory board" means the individual or group of individuals that
allocate expenditures from a political issues committee.
